Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-3206
School; school employee; immunity.

(1) A school or school employee who acts in compliance with the Seizure Safe Schools Act shall not be liable for damages related to the care of a student's seizure disorder unless such damages resulted from an act of willful or wanton misconduct by the school or school employee.

(2) A school employee shall not be subject to any disciplinary proceeding related to an act taken in compliance with the Seizure Safe Schools Act unless such action constitutes willful or wanton misconduct.

Laws 2021, LB639, § 6.